Tennessee, session 114, HB2593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-1-111, is amended by adding the
following after "of all of its meetings.":
The report may be provided electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2593
011291
- 1 -